Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2745.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 22-7.4 of the General Laws entitled "Permanent Joint Committee on
Naming All New Buildings, Bridges, Edifices and Other State Constructions" is hereby amended
by adding thereto the following section:
22-7.4-160. Joseph M. Lima Overpass.
The India Point Park Overpass pedestrian bridge spanning the highway in the City of
Providence shall hereafter be named and known as the "Joseph M. Lima Overpass" in recognition
of his lifetime of selfless public service and his enduring impact on the Fox Point neighborhood
and the State of Rhode Island.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005332
========